Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.422

Office of cybersecurity—Reports and information.

The reports and information compiled pursuant to RCW 43.105.450 and section 7, chapter 291, Laws of 2021 are confidential and may not be disclosed under this chapter.

[ 2021 c 291 s 8.]